Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.901

References to the director or department of licensing—1989 1st ex.s. c 9.

All references to the director of licensing or department of licensing in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the secretary or department of health when referring to the functions transferred in RCW 43.70.220.

[ 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 802.]